Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB480.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 335.030 is amended to read as follows:
No person shall engage in the practice of social work unless he or she is licensed in
accordance with the provisions of KRS 335.010 to 335.160 and 335.990, and no person
shall hold himself or herself out to the public by any title or description of services
representing himself or herself as a "Certified Social Worker," "Licensed Social
Worker," "Licensed Clinical Social Worker," or any other title that includes such words
except as such usage of title or description is authorized by KRS 335.010 to 335.160 and
335.990.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/11/2025 1:56 PM Jacketed